tr: Kalibrasyon sensörü tipi: Kalibrasyon kiti; Renk kalibrasyon çizelgesi; Renk okuyucu; Kolorimetre; Ekran analizörü; LUT kutusu; Desen üreticisi; Yazılım anahtarı; Spektrokolorimetre; Spektrofotometre; Diğer
zh-CN: 校准传感器类型: 校准套件; 色彩校准图表; 色彩读取器; 色度计; 显示分析仪; LUT 盒; 图案生成器; 软件密钥; 分光色度计; 分光光度计; 其他
zh-TW: 校準感測器類型: 校準套件; 色彩校準圖表; 色彩讀取器; 色度計; 顯示器分析儀; LUT 盒; 圖案產生器; 軟體金鑰; 光譜色度計; 分光光度計; 其他
sl-SI: Tip kalibracijskega senzorja: Komplet za kalibracijo; Grafikon za kalibracijo barv; Čitalnik barv; Kolorimeter; Analizator zaslonov; LUT škatla; Generator vzorcev; Programski ključ; Spektrokolorimeter; Spektrofotometer; Drugo
es: Tipo de sensor de calibración: Kit de calibración; Carta de calibración de color; Lector de color; Colorímetro; Analizador de pantalla; Caja LUT; Generador de patrones; Clave de software; Espectrocolorímetro; Espectrofotómetro; Otros
el: Τύπος αισθητήρα βαθμονόμησης: Κιτ βαθμονόμησης; Διάγραμμα βαθμονόμησης χρωμάτων; Αναγνώστης χρώματος; Χρωματόμετρο; Αναλυτής οθόνης; Κουτί LUT; Γεννήτρια προτύπων; Κλειδί λογισμικού; Φασματοχρωματόμετρο; Φασματοφωτόμετρο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta senzora za kalibraciju: Komplet za kalibraciju; Tablica za kalibraciju boja; Čitač boja; Kolorimetar; Analizator zaslona; LUT kutija; Generator uzoraka; Softverski ključ; Spektrokolorimetar; Spektrofotometar; Ostalo
en: Calibration sensor type: Calibration kit; Color calibration chart; Color reader; Colorimeter; Display analyzer; LUT box; Pattern generator; Software key; Spectrocolorimeter; Spectrophotometer; Other
bg-BG: Тип сензор за калибриране: Калибриращ комплект; Диаграма за цветова калибрация; Цветови четец; Колориметър; Анализатор на дисплей; LUT кутия; Генератор на шаблони; Софтуерен ключ; Спектроколориметър; Спектрофотометър; Други
cs: Typ kalibračního senzoru: Kalibrační sada; Barevná kalibrační tabulka; Čtečka barev; Kolorimetr; Analyzátor displeje; LUT box; Generátor vzorů; Softwarový klíč; Spektrokolorimetr; Spektrofotometr; Jiné
ja: キャリブレーションセンサータイプ: キャリブレーションキット; カラーキャリブレーションチャート; カラーリーダー; カラーメーター; ディスプレイアナライザー; LUTボックス; パターンジェネレーター; ソフトウェアキー; スペクトロカラーメーター; 分光光度計; その他
de: Kalibrierungssensortyp: Kalibrierungsset; Farbkalibrierungstafel; Farblesegerät; Kolorimeter; Display-Analysator; LUT-Box; Mustergenerator; Softwareschlüssel; Spektralkolorimeter; Spektralphotometer; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di sensore di calibrazione: Kit di calibrazione; Grafico di calibrazione colore; Lettore di colore; Colorimetro; Analizzatore di display; Box LUT; Generatore di pattern; Chiave software; Spettrocolorimetro; Spettrofotometro; Altro
sk-SK: Typ kalibračného senzora: Kalibračná súprava; Farebná kalibračná tabuľka; Čítačka farieb; Kolorimeter; Analyzátor displeja; LUT box; Generátor vzorov; Softvérový kľúč; Spektrokolorimeter; Spektrofotometer; Iné
sv: Kalibreringssensortyp: Kalibreringskit; Färgkalibreringstabell; Färgläsare; Kolorimeter; Bildskärmsanalysator; LUT-box; Mönstergenerator; Programvarunyckel; Spektrokolorimeter; Spektrofotometer; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de sensor de calibração: Kit de calibração; Carta de calibração de cores; Leitor de cores; Colorímetro; Analisador de display; Caixa LUT; Gerador de padrões; Chave de software; Espectrocolorímetro; Espectrofotômetro; Outro
fr: Type de capteur de calibrage: Kit de calibrage; Charte de calibrage couleur; Lecteur de couleur; Colorimètre; Analyseur d'affichage; Boîtier LUT; Générateur de mires; Clé logicielle; Spectrocolorimètre; Spectrophotomètre; Autre
nl: Kalibratie sensortype: Kalibratieset; Kleurkalibratieschema; Kleurlezer; Colorimeter; Beeldschermanalyser; LUT-box; Patroongenerator; Softwaresleutel; Spectrocolorimeter; Spectrofotometer; Andere
ro-RO: Tip senzor calibrare: Kit de calibrare; Diagramă de calibrare a culorilor; Cititor de culori; Colorimetru; Analizor de ecran; Cutie LUT; Generator de modele; Cheie software; Spectrocolorimetru; Spectrofotometru; Altele
th: ประเภทเซ็นเซอร์ปรับเทียบ: ชุดปรับแต่ง; แผนภูมิปรับแต่งสี; เครื่องอ่านสี; เครื่องวัดสี; เครื่องวิเคราะห์จอภาพ; กล่อง LUT; เครื่องสร้างรูปแบบ; คีย์ซอฟต์แวร์; สเปกโตรโคลอริมิเตอร์; สเปกโตรโฟโตมิเตอร์; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Kalibravimo jutiklio tipas: Kalibravimo rinkinys; Spalvų kalibravimo lentelė; Spalvų skaitytuvas; Kolorimetras; Ekrano analizatorius; LUT dėžė; Šablonų generatorius; Programinės įrangos raktas; Spektrokolorimetras; Spektrofotometras; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de sensor de calibração: Kit de calibração; Gráfico de calibração de cor; Leitor de cor; Colorímetro; Analisador de ecrã; Caixa LUT; Gerador de padrões; Chave de software; Espectrocolorímetro; Espectrofotómetro; Outro
nb: Kalibreringssensor type: Kalibreringssett; Fargekalibreringskart; Fargeleser; Kolorimeter; Skjermanalysator; LUT-boks; Mønstergenerator; Programvarenøkkel; Spektrokolorimeter; Spektrofotometer; Annet
fi: Kalibrointianturin tyyppi: Kalibrointipaketti; Värikalibrointikaavio; Värinlukija; Kolorimetri; Näyttöanalysaattori; LUT-laatikko; Kuviogeneraattori; Ohjelmistoavain; Spektrokolorimetri; Spektrofotometri; Muu
da: Kalibreringssensor-type: Kalibreringssæt; Farvekalibreringskort; Farvelæser; Kolorimeter; Skærmanalysator; LUT-boks; Mønstergenerator; Softwarenøgle; Spektrokolorimeter; Spektrofotometer; Andet
ko: 교정 센서 유형: 캘리브레이션 키트; 컬러 캘리브레이션 차트; 컬러 리더; 컬러미터; 디스플레이 분석기; LUT 박스; 패턴 생성기; 소프트웨어 키; 분광 컬러미터; 분광 광도계; 기타
vi: Loại cảm biến hiệu chuẩn: Bộ hiệu chuẩn; Bảng hiệu chuẩn màu; Máy đọc màu; Máy đo màu; Máy phân tích màn hình; Hộp LUT; Máy tạo mẫu; Khóa phần mềm; Máy đo quang phổ màu; Máy quang phổ; Khác
ru: Тип датчика калибровки: Калибровочный набор; Таблица цветовой калибровки; Считыватель цвета; Колориметр; Анализатор дисплея; LUT-бокс; Генератор шаблонов; Программный ключ; Спектроколориметр; Спектрофотометр; Другой
pl: Typ czujnika kalibracyjnego: Zestaw kalibracyjny; Tabela kalibracji kolorów; Czytnik kolorów; Kolorymetr; Analizator wyświetlacza; Skrzynka LUT; Generator wzorców; Klucz programowy; Spektrokolorymetr; Spektrofotometr; Inne
hu: Kalibrációs szenzor típusa: Kalibráló készlet; Színkalibrációs táblázat; Színolvasó; Kolorimétер; Kijelző elemző; LUT doboz; Mintagenerátor; Szoftverkulcs; Spektrokoloriméter; Spektrofotométer; Egyéb